Utah statutes.
72-12-104.   Ride-sharing arrangements -- Exemption from specified laws and
rules.
The following laws and rules do not apply to ride-sharing arrangements:
(1)  laws and rules containing insurance requirements that are specifically
applicable to motor carriers or commercial vehicles;
(2)  laws imposing a higher standard of care on drivers or owners of motor
carriers or commercial vehicles than that imposed on drivers or owners of
other motor vehicles;
(3)  laws and rules with equipment requirements and special accident reporting
requirements that are specifically applicable to motor carriers or commercial
vehicles; and
(4)  laws imposing a tax on fuel purchased in other states by motor carriers
or road user taxes on commercial buses.
